District of Columbia statutes.
4-251.02

Establishment of program to provide subsidies for grandparent caregivers.

(a)

No later than March 1, 2006, the Mayor shall establish a program through which eligible grandparents may receive subsidy payments for the care and custody of a child residing in their home.

(b)

Repealed.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-69, § 102, 53 DCR 54
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5002, 57 DCR 181

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-111, in subsec. (a), deleted “pilot” preceding “program”; and repealed subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) The pilot program shall continue through September 30, 2009.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-278, February 22, 2006, 53 DCR 1459).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5002 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5002 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short Title

Short title: Section 5001 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle A of title V of the act may be cited as the “Grandparent Caregivers Extension Program Amendment Act of 2009”.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Act 16-278, the Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Establishment Emergency Act of 2006, and any substantially identical successor legislation, see Mayor’s Order 2006-38, March 20, 2006 ( 53 DCR 5078).